Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 18

Check Cashing Act

45-18-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Check Cashing Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 1.

Cross-References. Check cashing regulations, §45-17-102.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-18-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Applicant” means a person filing an application for a license under this chapter;

“Check” means any payment instrument;

“Check casher” means a person who, for compensation, provides currency in exchange for payment instrument received;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions;

“Consideration” means and includes any premium charged for the sale of goods, or services provided in connection with the sale of the goods that is in excess of the cash price of the goods or services;

“Control” means ownership of, or the power to vote, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of a licensee controlled by any person. There shall be aggregated with the person's interest the interest of any other person controlled by the person or by any spouse, parent, or child of the person;

“Currency” means the coin and paper money of the United States or of any other country that is designated as legal tender and that circulates and is customarily used and accepted as a medium of exchange in the country of issuance. “Currency” includes United States silver certificates, United States notes, and Federal Reserve notes. “Currency” also includes official foreign bank notes that are customarily used and accepted as a medium of exchange in a foreign country;

“Department” means the department of financial institutions;

“Licensee” means a check cashing business licensed by the commissioner to engage in that business in accordance with this chapter;

“Material litigation” means any litigation that, according to generally accepted accounting principles, is deemed significant to a person's financial health and would be required to be referenced in annual audited financial statements, reports to shareholders or similar documents;

“Payment instrument” means a check, draft, warrant, money order, traveler's check or other instrument for payment of money, whether or not negotiable. “Payment instrument” does not include an instrument that is redeemable by the issuer in merchandise or service, a credit card voucher, or a letter of credit; and

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, trust, corporation, limited liability company, or other group, however organized, but does not include the governments of the United States or this state or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Recovery of attorney fees, costs and other charges by check casher, OAG 98-070, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/25/98).

45-18-103. Application.

This chapter does not apply to:

Any bank, trust company, credit union, building and loan association, savings bank or mutual bank organized under the laws of any state or the United States;

Persons who offer a check cashing service without receiving, directly or indirectly, any consideration or fee; and

Persons engaged in the cashing of payment instruments that is incidental to the retail sale of goods or services, whose compensation for cashing payment instruments at each site does not exceed five percent (5%) of the gross receipts from the retail sale of goods or services by the person during the person's most recently completed fiscal year.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 3; 2007, ch. 80, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Recovery of attorney fees, costs and other charges by check casher, OAG 98-070, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/25/98).

45-18-104. License requirement.

No person shall engage in, or in any manner advertise engagement in, the business of cashing payment instruments without first obtaining a license under this chapter. A separate license shall be required for each location from which the business is conducted.

Any licensed money transmitter or registered industrial loan and thrift company engaged in the business of cashing payment instruments on October 1, 2007, may continue to engage in the business of cashing payment instruments without a license issued by the commissioner, until the commissioner has acted upon the application for license, if the application is filed by December 31, 2007.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 4; 2007, ch. 80, § 2.

45-18-105. Qualifications of licensee.

Each applicant for a license shall demonstrate, and each licensee shall maintain, a minimum net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each location.

Every corporate applicant, at the time of filing an application for a license under this part and at all times after a license is issued, shall be in good standing in the state of its incorporation. All applicants, whether corporate or noncorporate, at the time of filing an application for a license under this part and at all times after a license is issued, shall be qualified to do business in this state.

Subject to the commissioner's discretion, no person shall be licensed under this chapter to do business in the state if the person has been adjudged guilty of any felony or if an executive officer, key shareholder or director of the person has been so adjudged. For purposes of this part, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if the person has either pleaded guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, obtained a pretrial diversion or been found guilty of a charge before a court or federal magistrate, or by the verdict of a jury, regardless of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension of the sentence. The department may take into consideration the fact that the plea of guilty, or the decision, judgment, or verdict, has been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process, or that the person convicted of the crime received a pardon from the jurisdiction where the conviction was entered, or received a certificate pursuant to any provision of law that removes the disability under this part because of the conviction.

The department may deny an initial application for a license if the applicant is the subject of a pending criminal prosecution or governmental enforcement action, in any jurisdiction, until the conclusion of the criminal prosecution or enforcement action.

All applicants shall demonstrate experience, character, and general fitness to command the confidence of the public and warrant the belief that the business to be operated thereunder will be operated lawfully and fairly. This requirement is continuing in nature. In determining whether this qualification has been met, the commissioner may review:

The business records and the capital adequacy of the applicant;

The competence, experience, integrity, and financial ability of any person who is a director, officer, supervisory employee or five percent (5%) shareholder of the applicant or owns or controls the applicant; and

Any record, on the part of the applicant or any person referenced in subdivision (e)(2) of any criminal activity, any fraud or other act of personal dishonesty, any act, omission, or practice that constitutes a breach of a fiduciary duty or any suspension, removal or administrative action by any agency or department of the United States or any state, from participation in the conduct of any business.

The commissioner may deny a license pursuant to this chapter to any applicant whose license or registration was revoked in any jurisdiction during the twelve-month period before the date of the application.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 5.

45-18-106. Application for license.

Each application for a license under this chapter shall be made in writing under oath, and in a form prescribed by the commissioner.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 6.

45-18-107. Supervision fee — Financial statements.

Each application for a license shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i). The supervision fee shall be applicable to each location; and

Financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year end prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles by a certified public accountant or public accounting firm.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 7; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 26, 27.

45-18-108. Issuance of license.

Upon the filing of a properly completed application, accompanied by the nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i), and other required documents, the department shall investigate to ascertain whether the qualifications and requirements prescribed by this chapter have been met. If the department finds the applicant meets the qualifications and requirements, the department shall issue the applicant a license to engage in the check cashing business in this state. Any license issued under this chapter shall remain in effect through December 31 of each year following its date of issuance unless otherwise specified by the department or earlier surrendered, suspended, or revoked. If the commissioner finds that the qualifications and requirements prescribed by this chapter have not been met, the commissioner shall deny the application in writing setting forth the reasons for the denial.

The commissioner shall approve or deny every application for a license within ninety (90) days from the date a completed application with all required fees and documents is submitted, which period may be extended by the written consent of the commissioner. If the commissioner denies an application, or if the commissioner fails to act on an application within ninety (90) days after its filing, the applicant may make written demand to the department for a hearing before the commissioner on the question of whether the license should be granted.

Any hearing on the denial of a license shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In the hearing, the burden of proving that the applicant is entitled to a license is on the applicant. Decisions of the commissioner following any hearing on the denial of a license are subject to review under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Licenses are not transferable or assignable.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 8; 2014, ch. 736, § 28; 2017, ch. 122, § 16.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e), concerning filing an application for a license within ninety days of October 1, 1997, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2007.

45-18-109. License renewal.

Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter expire on December 31. A license may be renewed for the ensuing twelve-month period upon application by the license holder showing continued compliance with the qualifications for a license, filing of the completed renewal form, and payment of the nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i). A licensee making timely and complete application and payment for renewal of its license may continue to operate under its existing license until its application is approved or denied. The completed renewal application and the payment of the annual supervision fee must be sent to the department on or before December 31, but no earlier than November 1, of each year.

A license holder submitting a renewal application pursuant to this chapter for a license expiring on March 31, 2018, must pay the supervision fee as provided in § 45-1-118(i) for each location. The completed renewal application and payment must be sent to the department on or before March 1, 2018. A renewed license issued under this chapter with a beginning effective date of April 1, 2018, expires on December 31, 2018.

The licensee shall include in its annual renewal report:

A copy of its most recent unconsolidated annual financial statement, including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in shareholder's equity and statement of changes in financial position, except that a licensee may provide the most recent consolidated annual financial statement of the parent corporation if the statement includes the balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in shareholder's equity and statement of changes of financial position of the licensee;

Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the licensee on its original application that have not previously been reported to the commissioner on any other report required to be filed under this chapter;

Notification of material litigation relating to the businesses regulated under this chapter; and

Other information that the commissioner may deem appropriate for the proper enforcement of this chapter.

The commissioner may establish a biennial license arrangement for the filing of the application for licensure renewal, but in no case shall the supervision fee be payable for more than one (1) year at a time.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 9; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 29-31; 2017, ch. 122, § 10; 2017, ch. 122, §§ 9, 10.

45-18-110. Licensee's change of address, name and/or ownership — Revocation of license.

No licensee shall change its address unless it has given fourteen (14) days prior notice to the commissioner.

No licensee shall change its name unless it has given fourteen (14) days prior notice to the commissioner.

A change in control of a licensee shall require prior written notice to the commissioner. In the case of a publicly traded corporation, notice shall be made in writing within thirty (30) days of a proposed change or acquisition of control of a licensee. Upon notification, the commissioner may require such information deemed necessary to determine whether an application for a license is required. “Control,” in the case of a corporation, has the meaning used in § 45-18-102. “Control,” in the case of any other entity, means any change in the principals of the organization, whether active or passive. Costs incurred by the department in investigating a change in control request shall be paid by the person or persons requesting approval. The commissioner may waive the filing of an application if, in the commissioner's discretion, the change of control does not pose any risk to the interests of the public.

Whenever control of a licensee is acquired or exercised in violation of this section, the license shall be deemed revoked as of the date of the unlawful acquisition of control. The licensee, or its controlling person, shall surrender the license to the commissioner on demand.

If the commissioner approves of the change of name, location or ownership and an amended license must be issued, a fifty dollar ($50.00) fee shall be paid for the amended license.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 10.

45-18-111. Location of check cashing business.

A licensee may operate the businesses regulated under this chapter at a location where any other business is operated or in association or conjunction with any other business as long as the licensee gives prior written notification to the commissioner and the other business is consistent with the following requirements:

The books, accounts and records of businesses regulated under this chapter are kept and maintained separate and apart from the books, accounts, and records of any other business; and

The other business is not of a type that would tend to enable the concealment of acts engaged in to evade the requirements of this chapter. If the commissioner determines upon investigation that the other business is of the type that would conceal the acts, the commissioner shall order the licensee to cease the operation of the businesses regulated under this chapter at that location.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 11.

45-18-112. Filing of written report with commissioner — Events impacting activities of licensee.

Within fifteen (15) days of the occurrence of any one (1) of the events listed in subdivisions (1)-(6), a licensee shall file a written report with the commissioner describing the event and its expected impact on the activities of the licensee in the state:

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or governmental authority;

The denial of the opportunity to engage in the check cashing business by any state or governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the licensee or any of its officers, directors or principals;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its officers, directors, or principals; and

Other events that the commissioner may determine and identify by rule.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 12.

45-18-113. Examination of licensee by commissioner.

The commissioner may conduct periodic examinations of a licensee to determine compliance with this chapter. In conducting the examination, the commissioner or the commissioner's staff shall have full and free access to all the books, papers and records of the licensee and may summon and qualify as witnesses, under oath, and examine the directors, officers, members, agents and employees of any licensee, and any other person concerning the condition and affairs of the licensee. The cost for an examination or investigation of licensees shall be assessed pursuant to § 45-1-118(i).

Upon reasonable cause, the commissioner may conduct an examination of any unlicensed person to determine whether violations of this chapter have occurred or are occurring. In conducting the examination, the commissioner has the ability to summon witnesses and examine them under oath concerning matters relating to the business of the persons or other matters that may be relevant to the discovery of a violation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the conduct of business without a license as required under this chapter. An unlicensed person subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter, who is examined or investigated in accordance with this chapter, shall pay to the commissioner the reasonable and actual expenses of the examination or investigation.

The commissioner may promulgate reasonable regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the enforcement of this chapter. A copy of any rule or regulation adopted by the commissioner shall be mailed to each license holder at least thirty (30) days before the date it takes effect.

The commissioner is authorized to disclose information obtained pursuant to this chapter to any local, state or federal agency as the commissioner deems proper.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 13; 2006, ch. 596, § 2; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 32, 33.

45-18-114. Required records.

Each licensee shall make, keep and preserve the books, accounts, records, and documents as the commissioner may determine by rule.

All records of the check cashing business shall be maintained separately by the licensee from any other business in which the licensee may engage.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 14.

45-18-115. Suspension or revocation of license.

After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner may suspend or revoke a license if the commissioner finds that:

Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when the licensee applied for its license, would have been grounds for denying the application;

The licensee violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or order validly promulgated or issued by the commissioner;

The licensee refuses to permit the commissioner to make any examination authorized by this chapter;

The licensee willfully fails to make any report or pay any fee required by this chapter;

The licensee has been found guilty of or liable for any fraudulent act or practice;

The licensee has made any material false representation to the commissioner in any application or report filed with the commissioner; or

The licensee has abandoned its place of business for a period of sixty (60) days or more.

The commissioner may only revoke or suspend the particular license with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension may occur or exist unless the commissioner finds that the grounds for revocation or suspension are of general application to all offices or to more than one (1) office operated by the licensee, in which case the commissioner may revoke or suspend all of the licenses issued to the licensee.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 15.

45-18-116. Hearing.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, applies to any hearing afforded pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 16.

45-18-117. Civil penalties.

If, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that a person has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter, the commissioner may, in addition to all other powers conferred in this chapter:

Order the person to cease and desist violating the chapter or its rules and require the refund of any fees collected by the person in violation of this chapter; and

Order the person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in an amount specified by the commissioner, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 17.

45-18-118. Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into consent orders at any time with any person to resolve any matter arising under this chapter. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued or a duly authorized representative, and must indicate agreement to the terms contained therein. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter has been violated, nor need it constitute a finding by the commissioner that the person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the commissioner may seek civil penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any enforcement action authorized by this chapter without providing the opportunity for a prior hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken that is filed with the commissioner within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the notice of the commissioner's emergency action.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 18.

45-18-119. Criminal penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this chapter or any order or rule pursuant thereto for which a penalty is not specifically provided commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day the violation occurs is a separate offense.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a material, false statement in any document filed or required to be filed under this chapter with the intent to deceive the recipient of the document commits a Class E felony.

Any person who knowingly and willfully fails to file a document required to be filed under this chapter commits a Class E felony.

Any person who carries on an unauthorized check cashing business commits a Class E felony.

Any person who obstructs or endeavors to obstruct a lawful examination of a licensee commits a Class E felony.

It is the duty of the commissioner to submit to the appropriate district attorney general for the respective counties of the state any criminal violation of this chapter known by the commissioner to have occurred in the county. The commissioner shall also report the violation to the appropriate division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The commissioner may provide the information to the attorney general and reporter or the appropriate federal authorities, or both, as the commissioner deems proper. Confidential information that is communicated by the commissioner pursuant to this section remains confidential in the hands of the agency to which the information is reported, and does not become a matter of public record by virtue of this communication.

In addition to the criminal penalty provided for in this section, the commissioner may also commence an action to enjoin the operation of the business through a cease and desist order.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 19.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

45-18-120. Licensee's conduct — Written complaints.

Any person aggrieved by the conduct of a licensee under this chapter in connection with the regulated activities, may file a written complaint with the commissioner who may investigate the complaint.

In the course of the investigation of the complaint, the commissioner may:

Subpoena witnesses;

Administer oaths;

Examine any individual under oath; and

Compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents relevant to the investigation.

If any person fails to comply with a subpoena of the commissioner under this chapter or to testify concerning any matter about which the person may be interrogated under this chapter, the commissioner may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement.

The license of any licensee under this chapter who fails to comply with a subpoena of the commissioner may be suspended pending compliance with the subpoena.

The commissioner has the administrative power to investigate and enforce any and all complaints filed by any person that are not criminal in nature, which complaint relates to check cashing businesses, including licensees hereunder and those who are exempt under § 45-18-103.

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 20.

45-18-121. Check cashing — Practice and procedure.

Before a licensee deposits with any financial institution a payment instrument that is cashed by a licensee, the item must be endorsed with the actual name under which the licensee is doing business. Additionally, the words “Licensed Check Cashing Business” must be written legibly or stamped immediately after or below the name of the endorser.

Licensees shall comply with all applicable federal statutes governing currency transaction reporting.

Every licensee shall display its license and post a notice containing its charges for services regulated under this chapter.

Licensees may not alter or delete the date on any check cashed.

Licensees shall issue a receipt for each check cashing transaction upon request. The receipt shall include, among other matters the licensee may desire to include, the amount of the check and the total fee charged.

The maximum fee a licensee may charge for a bad check is twenty dollars ($20.00).

No licensee may advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, any statement or representation that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material information.

Within ten (10) business days after being advised by the payor financial institution that a payment instrument has been altered, forged, stolen, obtained through fraudulent or illegal means, negotiated without proper legal authority, or represents the proceeds of illegal activity, the licensee shall notify the police department in the city or town where the office of the licensee is located at which the check was cashed. If a payment instrument is returned to the licensee by the payor financial institution for any of the aforementioned reasons, the licensee may not release the payment instrument without the consent of the city or town police department, or other investigative law enforcement authority.

No licensee shall issue coupons, gift certificates or tokens to be used in lieu of money when cashing a check.

No licensee shall require the customer to receive payment by a method that causes the customer to pay additional or further fees and charges to the licensee or other person.

No licensee shall conduct a business regulated under this chapter at a location other than the licensed location.

No licensee shall receive any other charges or fees in addition to the fees listed in this chapter.

Licensees shall pay to every customer tendering a payment instrument to be cashed the entire face amount of the instrument in cash, less any charges permitted by law, on the same date upon which the instrument is presented.

Licensees shall not require that a customer cash two (2) separate checks in a manner to avoid the limitations on the fees a licensee can charge.

No check casher shall:

Charge check cashing fees, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in excess of five percent (5%) of the face amount of the payment instrument or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater;

Charge check cashing fees in excess of three percent (3%) of the face amount of the payment instrument, or two dollars ($2.00), whichever is greater, if the payment instrument is the payment of any kind of state public assistance or federal social security benefit payable to the bearer of the payment instrument; or

Charge check cashing fees for personal checks or money orders in excess of ten percent (10%) of the face amount of the personal check or money order or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater.

No licensee shall agree to hold a payment instrument for later deposit.

Licensees may charge a customer with a one-time membership fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

Acts 1997, ch. 309, § 21.

Attorney General Opinions. Recovery of attorney fees, costs and other charges by check casher, OAG 98-070, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/25/98).

45-18-122. Licensing through multi-state automated licensing system.

In addition to any other powers imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner is authorized to require persons subject to this chapter to be licensed through a multi-state automated licensing system. Pursuant to this authority, the commissioner may:

Promulgate any rules reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish relationships or enter into agreements reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system. The agreements may include, but are not limited to, operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and technology licensing agreements;

Require that applications for licensing under this chapter and renewals of such licenses be filed with a multi-state automated licensing system;

Require that any fees required to be paid under this chapter be paid through a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish deadlines for transitioning licenses to a multi-state automated licensing system. The commissioner may deny any applications or renewal applications not filed with a multi-state automated licensing system after the deadlines have passed, notwithstanding any other deadlines established in this chapter. The commissioner shall provide reasonable notice of any transition deadlines to licensees; and

Take such further actions as are reasonably necessary to give effect to this section.

Nothing in this section authorizes the commissioner to require a person who is not subject to this chapter to submit information to, or participate in, a multi-state automated licensing system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner retains full authority and discretion to license persons under this chapter and to enforce this chapter. Nothing in this section reduces or derogates that authority and discretion.

Applicants for and holders of licenses issued under this chapter must pay all costs associated with submitting an application or transitioning a license to a multi-state automated licensing system, as well as all costs associated with maintaining and renewing any license issued by the commissioner on a multi-state automated licensing system.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 11.

45-18-123. Agent for channeling information.

The commissioner is authorized to use a multi-state automated licensing system as an agent for channeling information, whether criminal or noncriminal in nature, and whether derived from or distributed to the United States department of justice, any other state or federal governmental agency, or any other source, that the commissioner is authorized to request or distribute under this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 11.

45-18-124. Privacy or confidentiality of shared information.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

The requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to a multi-state automated licensing system, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, continue to apply to the information or material after it has been disclosed to a multi-state automated licensing system. The information or material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with check-cashing industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law, including the protection available under § 45-1-120;

For purposes of subdivision (1), the commissioner may enter into agreements or sharing agreements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, or other associations representing governmental agencies, as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner;

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality protection under subdivision (1) is not subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil action or administrative process, unless the person to whom such information or material pertains, in the person's discretion, waives any applicable privilege held by a multi-state automated licensing system, in whole or in part;

This section supersedes any inconsistent provisions of title 10, chapter 7, part 5, pertaining to the records open to public inspection; and

This section does not apply with respect to information or material relating to publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against persons subject to this chapter that is included in a multi-state automated licensing system for access by the public.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 11.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.